District of Columbia statutes.
16-524

Judgment generally; condemnation of attached property.

(a)

If the defendant in the action has been served with process, final judgment may not be rendered against the garnishee until the action against the defendant is determined.

(b)

If in such an action judgment is rendered for the defendant, the garnishee shall be discharged and shall recover his costs, and the property attached or its proceeds shall be restored to the garnishee or to the defendant, as the case may require.

(c)

If in such an action judgment is rendered in favor of the plaintiff against the defendant, and it appears that the plaintiff is entitled to a judgment of condemnation of the property attached, the court shall proceed to enter such judgment in the attachment as is directed by sections 16-525 to 16-527.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 550, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
This section is referenced in § 16-529.
1981 Ed., § 16-524.
1973 Ed., § 16-524.